New Mexico, session 2026, HB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thirty-five million dollars ($135,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the New Mexico housing trust fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of the New Mexico Housing Trust Fund Act. Any unexpended or unencumbered balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. .232396.1SA